Montana, session 2025, HB444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 70-25-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-25-201. Security deposit -- deductions authorized therefrom. (1) A landlord renting property
covered by this chapter may deduct from the security deposit a sum equal to the damage alleged to have been
caused by the tenant, together with a sum equal to the unpaid rent, late charges, utilities, penalties due under
lease provisions, and other money owing to the landlord at the time of deduction, including rent owed under 70-
24-441(3), and a sum for actual cleaning expenses, including a reasonable charge for the landlord's labor.
(2) At the request of either party, the premises may be inspected within 1 week prior to termination
of the tenancy.
(3) (A) Cleaning charges may not be imposed for normal maintenance performed on a cyclical
basis by the landlord as noted by the landlord at the time that the tenant occupies the space unless the landlord
is forced to perform this maintenance because of negligence of the tenant. Additionally, cleaning charges may
not be deducted until written notice has been given to the tenant. The notice must include the cleaning not
accomplished by the tenant and the additional AMOUNT and type or types of cleaning that need to be done by
the tenant to bring the premises back to its condition at the time of its renting.
(B) After the delivery of the notice PURSUANT TO 70-24-108 OR 70-33-106, the tenant has 24 hours
to complete the required cleaning, unless the rental agreement is already terminated pursuant to 70-24-427 or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 444

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0444.3
70-33-427 and the landlord has a pending claim for actual damages filed in court. The notice may be
transmitted to an electronic mail address provided by the tenant in the rental agreement, delivered in hand to
the tenant, or mailed with a certificate of mailing or by certified mail to the tenant at the place indicated by the
tenant as the place for receipt of the communication or, in the absence of a designation, to the tenant's last-
known address. If notice is transmitted by electronic mail, it is complete on receipt of a read receipt generated
by an electronic mail system or an electronic mail reply other than an automatically generated electronic mail
reply. If THE notice is mailed by certified mail, service of the notice is considered to have been made 3 days
after the date of the mailing.
(C) A tenant who fails to notify the landlord of the intent to vacate or who vacates the premises
without notice relieves the landlord of the requirement of giving notice and allows the landlord to deduct the
cleaning charges from the deposit, or the landlord may leave a copy of the notice in a conspicuous location in
the rental unit and notify the tenant by e-mail, phone, or text, and notice is considered delivered.
(4) A person may not deduct or withhold from the security deposit any amount for purposes other
than those set forth in this section."

Section 2. Section 70-25-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-25-202. List of damages and refund -- delivery to departing tenant. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2):
(a) (I) Each landlord, within 30 days subsequent to the termination of a tenancy or within 30 days
subsequent to a surrender and acceptance of the leasehold premises, whichever occurs first, shall provide the
departing tenant with a written list of any rent due and any damage and cleaning charges, brought after the
provisions of 70-25-201 have been followed, with regard to the leasehold premises that the landlord alleges are
the responsibility of the tenant. Delivery of the list must be accompanied by payment of the difference, if any,
between the security deposit and the permitted charges set forth in 70-25-201.
(II) Delivery must be accomplished by transmitting the list to an electronic mail address provided
by the tenant in the rental agreement and the refund by electronic fund transfer as set forth in 70-25-205, by
delivering the list and refund in hand to the tenant, or by mailing the list and refund to OF THE REFUND MAY MUST
BE ACCOMPLISHED BY DIFFERENT FORMS OF PAYMENT THAT INCLUDE ELECTRONIC FUND TRANSFERS, CASH, CHECK, OR
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 444

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0444.3
OTHER FORMS OF REFUND, OR BY MAILING THE SECURITY DEPOSIT TO THE NEW ADDRESS PROVIDED BY THE TENANT OR,
IF A NEW ADDRESS IS NOT PROVIDED, TO THE TENANT'S LAST-KNOWN ADDRESS STATED IN THE RENTAL AGREEMENT AT
THE COMMENCEMENT OF THE RENTAL AGREEMENT. DELIVERY OF THE WRITTEN LIST MUST BE NOTICED PURSUANT TO
70-24-108 OR 70-33-106. THE LANDLORD SHALL MAIL THE REFUND AND WRITTEN LIST TO THE DEPARTING TENANTS AT
the new address provided by the tenant or, if a new address is not provided, to the tenant's last-known address.
(b) (I) If after inspection there are no damages to the premises, no cleaning required, and no rent
unpaid and if the tenant can demonstrate that no utilities are unpaid by the tenant, the landlord shall return the
security deposit within 10 days by electronic fund transfer as set forth in 70-25-205 or by mailing it to the new
address provided by the tenant or, if a new address is not provided, to the tenant's last-known address.
(II) DELIVERY OF THE REFUND MAY MUST BE ACCOMPLISHED BY DIFFERENT FORMS OF PAYMENT THAT
INCLUDE ELECTRONIC FUND TRANSFERS, CASH, CHECK, OR OTHER FORMS OF REFUND, or by mailing the security
deposit to the new address provided by the tenant or, if a new address is not provided, to the tenant's last-
known address DELIVERY STATED IN THE RENTAL AGREEMENT AT THE COMMENCEMENT OF THE RENTAL AGREEMENT.
DELIVERY OF THE WRITTEN LIST MUST BE NOTICED PURSUANT TO 70-24-108 AND 70-33-106. THE LANDLORD SHALL
MAIL THE REFUND AND WRITTEN LIST TO THE DEPARTING TENANT AT THE NEW ADDRESS PROVIDED BY THE TENANT OR, IF
A NEW ADDRESS IS NOT PROVIDED, AT THE TENANT'S LAST-KNOWN ADDRESS ..
(c) It is not a wrongful withholding of security deposit funds if the landlord mails the funds to the
last-known address of a tenant who has departed and the tenant does not receive the funds because the tenant
has not given the landlord the tenant's new address, but the landlord remains liable to the tenant for the amount
due the tenant.
(2) This section does not apply if a rental agreement is terminated pursuant to 70-24-427 or 70-33-
427 and the landlord has a pending claim for actual damages filed in court."

Section 3. Section 70-25-205, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-25-205. Failure of departing tenant to furnish new address. (1) Failure by the departing tenant
to provide the landlord with a new address in writing upon termination of the tenancy or upon surrender and
acceptance of the leasehold premises, whichever occurs first, does not bar the tenant from recovering the
amount owing to the tenant by the landlord.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 444

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0444.3
(2) A landlord must be entitled to return a security deposit owing to a tenant by an electronic funds
transfer to an account designated by the tenant or on behalf of the tenant for recovering the amount owing to
the tenant by the landlord. "

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 444